Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2932
Bond service account and reserve accounts; requirements; use.

(1) The investment program shall maintain a bond service account and such reserve accounts as required by bond proceedings.

(2) Debt service payments from pledged revenue or other legally available money that are remitted to the State Treasurer shall be credited by the State Treasurer to the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Fund.

(3) For each fiscal year, the investment program shall annually determine and set aside an amount of money that is sufficient to pay the principal, interest, and costs related to the payment of such principal and interest that are due during such fiscal year.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 32.
July 18, 2026